Illinois, session 104th, SB2622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Natural Resources for a 7comprehensive study of the Kaskaskia River watershed in 8coordination with the United States Army Corps of Engineers.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.